Illinois, session 104th, SB1842.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 3.1-30-21 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-30-21)7    Sec. 3.1-30-21. Part-time police. A municipality may 8appoint, discipline, and discharge part-time police officers. 9A municipality that employs part-time police officers shall, 10by ordinance, establish hiring standards for part-time police 11officers and shall submit those standards to the Illinois Law 12Enforcement Training Standards Board.13    Part-time police officers shall be members of the regular 14police department, except for pension purposes. Part-time 15police officers shall not be assigned under any circumstances 16to supervise or direct full-time police officers of a police 17department, except in municipalities having a population of 18less than 3,000. Part-time police officers shall not be used 19as permanent replacements for permanent full-time police 20officers.21    Part-time police officers shall be trained under the 22Intergovernmental Law Enforcement Officer's In-Service 23Training Act in accordance with the procedures for part-time   SB1842- 2 -LRB104 07540 RTM 17584 b1police officers established by the Illinois Law Enforcement 2Training Standards Board. A part-time police officer hired 3after January 1, 1996 who has not yet received certification 4under Section 8.2 of the Illinois Police Training Act shall be 5directly supervised.6(Source: P.A. 89-170, eff. 1-1-96.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.